Vermont, session 2025-2026, H741.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 7559 is amended to read:
§ 7559. VIOLATIONS OF CONDITIONS OF RELEASE; FAILURE TO
APPEAR; WARRANTLESS ARREST
* * *
(c)(1) A person who has been released pursuant to section 7554 of this title
with or without bail on condition that the person appear at a specified time and
VT LEG #386307 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.741
2026 Page 2 of 3
place in connection with a prosecution for an offense and who without just
cause fails to appear shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not
more than $5,000.00, or both.
(2) The court shall issue an arrest warrant for a person who without just
cause fails to appear after being released pursuant to section 7554 of this title
with or without bail on condition that the person appear at a specified time and
place in connection with a prosecution for an offense. An arrest warrant issued
pursuant to this subdivision shall require the person to appear before a judicial
officer at the earliest possible time and shall not permit issuance of a citation to
appear.
(d) Notwithstanding Rule 3 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure, a
law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the officer
has probable cause to believe the person without just cause has failed to appear
at a specified time and place in connection with a prosecution for an offense or
has violated a condition of release relating to a restriction on travel or a
condition of release that the person not directly contact, harass, or cause to be
harassed a victim or potential witness.
* * *
(g) Notwithstanding Rule 3 of the Vermont Rules of Criminal Procedure,
the court shall issue an arrest warrant for a person who without just cause fails
to appear after a law enforcement officer has issued a citation to appear at a
VT LEG #386307 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.741
2026 Page 3 of 3
specified time and place in connection with a prosecution for an offense. An
arrest warrant issued pursuant to this subsection shall require the person to
appear before a judicial officer at the earliest possible time and shall not permit
issuance of a citation to appear.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386307 v.1